Connecticut, session 2026, SB00405.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
2 (1) "Advanced roadside impaired driving enforcement" has the same
3 meaning as provided in section 7-294kk of the general statutes;
4 (2) "Drug recognition expert" has the same meaning as provided in
5 section 7-294kk of the general statutes; and
6 (3) "Police officer" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-
7 294a of the general statutes.
8 (b) There is established an account to be known as the "impaired
9 driving enforcement and drug recognition training account", which
10 shall be a separate, nonlapsing account. The account shall contain any
11 moneys required by law to be deposited in the account. Moneys in the
12 account shall be expended by the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
sSB405 / File No. 303 1

sSB405 File No. 303
13 Management for the purposes of providing grants pursuant to
14 subsection (c) of this section.
15 (c) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall
16 administer the impaired driving enforcement and drug recognition
17 training grant program. Pursuant to such program, the secretary shall
18 provide grants-in-aid to reimburse or provide funding to municipalities
19 and the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection for the
20 costs associated with providing training to police officers who receive
21 advanced roadside impaired driving enforcement training or drug
22 recognition expert training. Such grants-in-aid may be provided to
23 municipalities or the department to (1) reimburse costs incurred from
24 having provided such training, provided such training occurred on or
25 after July 1, 2026, or (2) fund such training to be provided by a
26 municipality or the department. A municipality or the department may
27 submit an application for a grant under this section in a form and
28 manner prescribed by the secretary.
29 (d) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
30 secretary shall submit a report on the impaired driving enforcement and
31 drug recognition training grant program to the joint standing committee
32 of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public
33 safety and security in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of
34 the general statutes.
35 Sec. 2. Subsection (i) of section 12-330ll of the 2026 supplement to the
36 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
37 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
38 (i) The tax received by the state under this section shall be deposited
39 as follows:
40 (1) For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2022, and June 30, 2023, in the
41 cannabis regulatory and investment account established under section
42 21a-420f of the general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to January 1,
43 2025;
sSB405 / File No. 303 2

sSB405 File No. 303
44 (2) For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025, sixty
45 per cent of such tax received in the Cannabis Social Equity and
46 Innovation Fund established under section 21a-420f of the general
47 statutes, revision of 1958, revised to January 1, 2025, twenty-five per cent
48 of such tax received in the Cannabis Prevention and Recovery Services
49 Fund established under section 21a-420f of the general statutes, revision
50 of 1958, revised to January 1, 2025, and fifteen per cent in the General
51 Fund;
52 (3) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, sixty per cent of such tax
53 received in the social equity and innovation account established under
54 section 21a-420f, twenty-five per cent of such tax received in the
55 Cannabis Prevention and Recovery Services Fund established under
56 section 21a-420f and fifteen per cent in the General Fund;
57 (4) For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028, [sixty-
58 five] sixty per cent of such tax received in the social equity and
59 innovation account established under section 21a-420f, twenty-five per
60 cent of such tax received in the Cannabis Prevention and Recovery
61 Services Fund established under section 21a-420f, [and] ten per cent of
62 such tax received in the General Fund and five per cent of such tax
63 received in the impaired driving enforcement and drug recognition
64 training account established under section 1 of this act; and
65 (5) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, and each fiscal year
66 thereafter, [seventy-five] seventy per cent of such tax received in the
67 social equity and innovation account established under section 21a-420f,
68 [and] twenty-five per cent of such tax received in the Cannabis
69 Prevention and Recovery Services Fund established under section 21a-
70 420f and five per cent of such tax received in the impaired driving
71 enforcement and drug recognition training account established under
72 section 1 of this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
sSB405 / File No. 303 3

sSB405 File No. 303
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 12-330ll(i)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 2(i)(4), "of such tax received" was inserted before "in the
General Fund" for statutory consistency.
PS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB405 / File No. 303 4

sSB405 File No. 303
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Policy & Mgmt., Off. GF – Cost 92,900 90,770
State Comptroller - Fringe GF – Cost 37,700 37,700
Benefits1
Social Equity Council SEIA - Revenue 1.3 million 1.4 million
Loss
Policy & Mgmt., Off. Impaired driving 1.3 million 1.4 million
enforcement and
drug recognition
training account -
Revenue Gain
Emergency Services and Public GF - Potential Potential See Below
Protection, Dept. Revenue Gain
Note: SEIA=Social Equity and Innovation Account; GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
All Municipalities Potential Potential See Below
Revenue
Gain
Explanation
The bill results the following fiscal impacts associated with the
impaired driving enforcement and drug recognition training grant
program established under the bill.
1The fringe benefit costs for most state employees are budgeted centrally in accounts
administered by the Comptroller. The estimated active employee fringe benefit cost
associated with most personnel changes is 41.82% of payroll in FY 27.
sSB405 / File No. 303 5

sSB405 File No. 303
Office of and Policy and Management Cost
The bill results in a cost of $92,900 in FY 27 and an annual cost of
$90,770 beginning in FY 28 to the Office of Policy and Management
(OPM) for a Fiscal Administrative Officer and an annual corresponding
fringe benefit cost of $37,700 to administer an impaired driving
enforcement and drug recognition training grant program.
Cannabis Excise Tax Redistribution
The bill results in a revenue loss of $1.3 million in FY 27 and $1.4
million in FY 28 to the social equity and innovation account (SEIA) and
a corresponding revenue gain to the "impaired driving enforcement and
drug recognition training account" established under the bill by
redistributing a portion of the tax from the SEIA to the new account.
Revenue Gain to DESPP and Municipalities
The bill also results in a corresponding potential revenue gain in FY
27 and a revenue gain beginning in FY 28 to municipalities and the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection (DESPP) to
the extent grants are administered for costs associated with providing
training to certain police officers. Any revenue gain is dependent on the
cost of the training providing, the amount of the grant awarded, and the
funds available in the account.2
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
2 Only training that occurs beginning in FY 27 will qualify for grants from this account.
FY 27 grants will be dependent on the time it takes for OPM to establish the account
and for funds to accumulate.
sSB405 / File No. 303 6

sSB405 File No. 303
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 405
AN ACT CONCERNING THE IMPAIRED DRIVING ENFORCEMENT
AND DRUG RECOGNITION TRAINING GRANT PROGRAM.